Maryland, session 2026, HB0708.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0708*

HOUSE BILL 708
3–402.
This subtitle does not apply to a municipal corporation that:
(1) [does not require voter registration for its elections;
(2)] prior to January 1, 1990, used the voter registry supplied by the local
board as qualification for voting in municipal elections; or
[(3)] (2) provides for the local board to conduct municipal elections.
3–403.
(a) A voter residing in a municipal corporation is considered to be registered for
elections in that municipal corporation if the voter is included on the statewide voter
registration list at an address within the municipal corporation.
(g) This section may not be construed to prohibit a municipal corporation from
administering and maintaining a supplemental list of those individuals who are not on the
statewide voter registration list but who may otherwise be qualified to register to vote with
the municipal corporation.
Article – Local Government
4–108.6.
(A) EACH MUNICIPALITY SHALL REQUIRE VOTER REGISTRATION FOR ITS
ELECTIONS.
(B) AN INDIVIDUAL MAY NOT BECOME REGISTERED TO VOTE IN A
MUNICIPAL ELECTION IF THE INDIVIDUAL IS NOT A CITIZEN OF THE UNITED STATES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.